Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.040

Buildings—Erection—Improvements.

The state capitol committee may erect one or more permanent buildings; one or more temporary buildings; excavate or partially excavate for any such building or buildings; partially erect any such building or buildings; make other temporary or permanent improvements wholly or in part; upon the capitol grounds belonging to the state and known as the "Sylvester site" or "Capitol place" in Olympia, Washington.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.34.040. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 34 s 1; RRS s 7915-1.]